test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-papp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - papp â-stem : # Noun 'priest/pappi' - full paradigm
     papp+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: papp
     papp+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: paapp
     papp+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: paapp
     papp+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: paʹppe
     papp+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: paappâst
     papp+N+Sg+Com+Indef: paappin
     papp+N+Ess+Indef: pappân
     papp+N+Par+Indef: pappâd
     papp+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [paapptaa, paapptää]
     papp+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: paapp
     papp+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: paappi
     papp+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: paappid
     papp+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: paappid
     papp+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: paappin
     papp+N+Pl+Com+Indef: paappivuiʹm
     papp+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [paappitaa, paappitää]
     papp+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: paappâž
